Utah, session 2026, HB298.
Section 1. Section 53E-3-702 is amended to read:53E-3-702. State board to adopt public school construction guidelines.(1)As used in this section, "public school construction" means construction work on a new public school.(2)(a)The state board shall:(i)adopt guidelines for public school construction; and(ii)establish and maintain a school building design library as provided in Section 53E-3-713;(ii)(iii)consult with the Division of Facilities Construction and Management Administration and the state security chief appointed under Section 53-22-102 on proposed guidelines before adoption.;(iv)establish competitive bidding requirements for architectural and engineering design fees that include cost as a selection factor in addition to qualifications and experience; and(v) require that architectural and engineering design contracts include life-cycle cost analysis for energy efficiency, operations, maintenance, and material durability.(b)The state board shall ensure that guidelines adopted under Subsection (2)(a)(i) maximize funds used for public school construction and reflect efficient and economic use of those funds, including adopting guidelines that address a school's safety and a school's essential needs rather than encouraging or endorsing excessive costs per square foot of construction or nonessential facilities, design, or furnishings.(3)Before a school district or charter school may begin public school construction, the school district or charter school shall:(a)review the guidelines adopted by the state board under this section; and(b)review available designs in the school building design library established in Section 53E-3-713;(b)(c)take into consideration the guidelines when planning the public school construction.; and(d)comply with design ownership and submission requirements established in Section 53E-3-713.(4)In adopting the guidelines for public school construction, the state board shall consider the following and adopt alternative guidelines as needed:(a)location factors, including whether the school is in a rural or urban setting, and climate factors;(b)variations in guidelines for significant or minimal projected student population growth;(c)guidelines specific to schools that serve various populations and grades, including high schools, junior high schools, middle schools, elementary schools, alternative schools, and schools for people with disabilities; and(d)year-round use.(5)The guidelines shall address the following:(a)square footage per student;(b)minimum and maximum required real property for a public school;(c)athletic facilities and fields, playgrounds, and hard surface play areas;(d)necessary specifications to meet the safety standards created by the state security chief in Section 53E-3-706;(e)cost per square foot;(f)minimum and maximum qualities and costs for building materials;(g)design efficiency;(h)parking;(i)furnishing;(j)proof of compliance with applicable building codes; and(k)safety.;(l)allowable project delivery methods including design-bid-build, construction manager or general contractor, and design-build approaches that demonstrate cost savings potential; and(m)if applicable, the LEA's qualifications to manage a construction manager or general contractor delivery method.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53E-3-713 is enacted to read:53E-3-713. School building design library -- Development and use.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Elementary school" means a school that serves students primarily in kindergarten through grade 6.(b)"High school" means a school that serves students primarily in grades 9 through 12.(c)"Middle school" means a school that serves students primarily in grades 6 through 8 or grades 7 through 9.(d)"Multi-level school" means a school that serves students across multiple grade ranges, including K-12 schools and other grade combinations that span more than one school type category.(e)"School building design library" or "design library" means the collection of architectural plans and specification packages maintained by the state board under this section.(2)(a)No later than January 1, 2028, the state board shall establish and maintain a school building design library that includes designs for:(i)elementary schools;(ii)middle schools;(iii)high schools; and(iv)multi-level schools.(b)The state board may develop and include in the design library three standard designs for each school type listed in Subsection (2)(a) that vary by enrollment size and educational program needs.(c)The state board shall ensure that designs included in the design library:(i)meet all applicable building codes and safety requirements;(ii)provide flexibility for different geographic and climatic conditions;(iii)accommodate students with disabilities;(iv)incorporate modern educational practices and technology infrastructure;(v)allow for future expansion or modification; and(vi)reflect best practices in school design and construction.(d)If developing standardized designs for the design library, the state board shall consult with:(i)licensed architects with experience in school design;(ii)LEA representatives;(iii)construction industry professionals;(iv)educators and school administrators; and(v)the Division of Facilities Construction and Management Administration.(3)(a)To promote cost-effective school construction and facilitate sharing of successful designs among LEAs,Whenwhen an LEA enters into a contract for architectural or engineering services for school construction using public funds, the LEA shallmay:(i)negotiate to require in the contract that the LEA owns all plans, specifications, and design documents produced under the contract; and(ii)if negotiated, retain all intellectual property rights to the design.(b)An LEA that completes a school building design shall submit the final design documents to the state board for inclusion in the design library.(c)The state board shall:(i)review submitted designs for completeness and compliance with applicable codes;(ii)add qualifying designs to the design library within 90 days of submission; and(iii)make designs available to other LEAs at no cost.(4) An LEA constructing a new school building may:(a)select a design from the design library;(b)adapt a design from the design library to meet local needs; or(c)develop an original design in accordance with Subsection (3).(5)(a)The state board shall review and update the design library as frequently as needed to:(i)incorporate new technologies and educational practices;(ii)address changes in building codes and safety requirements;(iii)improve cost efficiency; and(iv)respond to feedback from LEAs.(b)The state board may make interim updates to the design library as needed to address safety issues or significant cost savings opportunities.(6)The state board shall:(a)publish the design library on the state board's website in a format that allows an LEA to search and compare designs; and(b)provide technical assistance to an LEA regarding use of designs from the library.(7)The state board may adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:(a)establish procedures for design submission and review;(b)define technical standards for designs in the library;(c)establish standardized formats for design documents; and(d)establish any other procedures necessary to implement this section.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53E-3-714 is enacted to read:53E-3-714. Public school construction cost reporting and transparency.(1)The state board shall establish standardized reporting requirements for all school construction projects exceeding $1,000,000.(2)An LEA shall report to the state board:(a)total project costs including design fees, construction costs, and contingencies;(b)cost per square foot;(c)design and construction timeline;(d)whether the project used a design from the design library and any cost impacts; and(e)change order costs and reasons.(3)The state board shall publish on the state board's website:(a)all LEA construction project data in a searchable, comparable format;(b)annual comparative analyses of construction costs across LEAs; and(c)best practices for cost-effective school construction.(4)The state board shall update the published data annually.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.